Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-162] Authority to administer oaths.
(a) The following members of the state military forces may administer oaths
for the purposes of military administration, including military justice, and
affidavits may be taken for those purposes before persons having the general
powers of a notary public:

(1) The state judge advocate and all assistant state
judge advocates;

(2) All law specialists;

(3) All summary courts-martial;

(4) All adjutants, assistant adjutants, acting
adjutants, and personnel adjutants;

(5) All commanding officers of the naval militia;

(6) All legal officers;

(7) The president, law officer, trial counsel, and
assistant trial counsel for all general and special courts-martial;

(8) The president and the counsel for the court of any
court of inquiry;

(9) All officers designated to take a deposition;

(10) All persons detailed to conduct an investigation;
and

(11) All other persons designated by rules of the
governor.

(b) Officers of the state military forces may
not be authorized to administer oaths as provided in this section unless they
are on active duty in or with those forces under orders of the governor as
prescribed in this chapter.

(c) The signature without seal of any such
person, together with the title of the person's office, is prima facie evidence
of the person's authority. [L 1982, c 171, pt of §2; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next